Mississippi, session 2026, SB2730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this act: (a)  "Impending weather event" means any forecasted or developing weather condition that poses a credible threat to life, property, or public safety, including, but not limited to, hurricanes, tornadoes, floods, ice storms, extreme heat, extreme cold, or severe storms. (b)  "Charitable organization" means a charitable unit of a religious or civic group that is exempt from taxation under 26 USC § 501, including those supported wholly or partially by private donations and registered with the Secretary of State. SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a charitable organization shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission arising out of, related to, or occurring in connection with the provision of services, assistance, aid, shelter, transportation, communications, logistics, security, utilities, emergency response, or other related activities during: (a)  A declared emergency; (b)  A government-ordered emergency; or (c)  An impending weather event. SECTION 3. The immunity granted under this act shall not be subject to exception, limitation, or qualification based upon the nature of the conduct giving rise to the claim.  No civil action shall be maintained against a covered organization for conduct occurring during the circumstances described in this act. SECTION 4. This act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose of encouraging rapid, decisive, and effective action during emergencies and impending weather events without fear of civil liability. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.